Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.050

Assistance to professional educator standards board for activities involving professional educator excellence.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide technical assistance to the professional educator standards board in the conduct of the activities described in RCW 28A.410.040 and 28A.410.050.

[ 2006 c 263 s 819; 1990 c 33 s 252; 1987 c 525 s 227. Formerly RCW 28A.03.375.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Intent—Short title—1987 c 525 ss 202-233: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.

Severability—1987 c 525: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 525 s 305.]